Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
CHAPTER 12 Automatic Renewal Provisions

13-12-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Automatic renewal provision” means a provision under which a service contract is renewed for a specified period of more than one month if the renewal causes the service contract to be in effect more than six months after the day of the initiation of the service contract. Such renewal is effective unless the consumer gives notice to the seller of the consumer’s intention to terminate the service contract.

“Consumer” means a natural person or a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 receiving service, maintenance, or repair benefits under a service contract. The term does not include a natural person engaged in business or employed by or otherwise acting on behalf of a governmental entity if the person enters into the service contract as part of or ancillary to the person’s business activities or on behalf of the business or governmental entity.

“Seller” means any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in commerce that sells, leases, or offers to sell or lease any service to a consumer pursuant to a service contract.

“Service contract” means a written contract for the performance of services for a specified period of time.

History.
Code 1981, §13-12-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1046, § 1/HB 234.

13-12-2.
Disclosure to consumer of automatic renewal provision in contract or contract offer.

Any seller that sells, leases, or offers to sell or lease any service to a consumer pursuant to a service contract that has an automatic renewal provision shall disclose the automatic renewal provision clearly and conspicuously in the contract or contract offer.

History.
Code 1981, §13-12-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1046, § 1/HB 234.

13-12-3.
Notice to consumer prior to automatic renewal of a service contract.

Any seller that sells, leases, or offers to sell or lease any service to a consumer pursuant to a service contract for a specified period of 12 months or more and that automatically renews for a specified period of more than one month, unless the consumer cancels the contract, shall provide the consumer with written or electronic notification of the automatic renewal provision. Notification shall be provided to the consumer no less than 30 days or no more than 60 days before the cancellation deadline pursuant to the automatic renewal provision. Such notification shall disclose clearly and conspicuously:

That unless the consumer cancels the contract, the contract will automatically renew; and

The methods by which the consumer may obtain details of the automatic renewal provision and cancellation procedure, including contacting the seller at a specified telephone number or address, referring to the contract, or any other method.

For any contract for service to a consumer that automatically renews for a specified period of more than 24 months, the seller shall, in addition to providing the notification required under subsection (a) of this Code section, obtain the following for the automatic renewal provision of such contract to be enforceable:

Written or electronic acknowledgment from the consumer of receipt of the notification required under subsection (a) of this Code section; and

An affirmative written or electronic response that the consumer does not intend to terminate the service contract.

History.
Code 1981, §13-12-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1046, § 1/HB 234; Ga. L. 2020, p. 363, § 1/HB 1039.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

13-12-4.
Applicability.

This chapter shall not apply to:

A financial institution as provided in Chapter 1 or 2 of Title 7 or any depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(c)(2);

A foreign bank maintaining a branch or agency licensed under the laws of any state of the United States;

Any subsidiary or affiliate of an entity provided in paragraph (1) or (2) of this Code section;

Any electric utility as provided in Chapter 3 of Title 46;

Any entity regulated pursuant to Chapter 45 of Title 43; or

Any county, municipal corporation, authority, or local government or governing body.

History.
Code 1981, §13-12-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1046, § 1/HB 234.

13-12-5.
Violation of chapter.

A violation of this chapter renders the automatic renewal provision of a contract void and unenforceable.

History.
Code 1981, §13-12-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1046, § 1/HB 234.